Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.77.320

Postsecondary wrestling grant program.

(1) Subject to availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the postsecondary wrestling grant program is created. The purpose of the postsecondary wrestling grant program is to provide funding to institutions of higher education to establish or maintain intercollegiate wrestling programs.

(2) The council shall administer the postsecondary wrestling grant program and award grants, based on a competitive grant process. The council shall establish minimum criteria for institutions of higher education to be awarded a grant.

(3) Grant funds may be allocated on a one-time or once every four-year basis dependent on the needs of the program and may be used for purposes including, but not limited to, support of one-time start-up costs, equipment, and student scholarships.

(4) For purposes of this section, "institutions of higher education" has the same meaning as in RCW 28B.10.016.

[ 2023 c 190 s 1.]

NOTES:

Short title—2023 c 190: "This act may be known and cited as the Charles Cate II act." [ 2023 c 190 s 2.]